Hawaii statutes.
§334-2 Mental health system. The
department of health shall foster and coordinate a comprehensive mental health
system utilizing public and private resources to reduce the incidence of mental
or emotional disorders and substance abuse, to treat and rehabilitate the
victims in the least restrictive and most therapeutic environment possible, and
to provide treatment and care for homeless individuals with serious and
persistent mental health challenges to enable them to reside in a permanent
dwelling unit or homeless facility, as defined in section 346-361. The
department shall administer such programs, services, and facilities as may be
provided by the State to promote, protect, preserve, care for, and improve the
mental health of the people. [L 1967, c 259, pt of §1; HRS §334-2; am L 1984, c
218, §2; am L 2016, c 186, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next